Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1203.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3103. Small estate primary residence affidavit.(a) Authorization.--A county property office may establish, consistent with this section, a process that permits transfer by affidavit of real property containing a primary residence during the administration of a small estate.(b) Small estate primary residence affidavit.--If a person dies while legally domiciled and owning a primary residence in a county that has established a process under subsection (a), the county in which the decedent was domiciled at the time of death may in a decree direct distribution of the primary residence to the parties entitled to the primary residence:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) upon petition of a party in interest;(2) in the discretion of the court;(3) with or without appraisement;(4) with notice as the court shall direct; and(5) whether or not letters have been issued or a will probated.(c) Process.--(1) Pursuant to the process developed by the county property office under subsection (a), the attorney for the descendants, ascendants or surviving spouse of the decedent shall record the property transfer of the decedent's primary residence with the county.(2) If the descendants, ascendants or surviving spouse of the decedent prove that their income is less than 120% of the Federal poverty guidelines, the county property office shall waive any filing fees under this section.(3) The authority of the court to award distribution of a primary residence under this section shall not be restricted because of the decedent's ownership of real estate, regardless of its value.(4) The decree of distribution shall:(i) Constitute sufficient authority to all transfer agents, registrars and others dealing with the primary residence of the estate to recognize the persons named in the decree as entitled to receive the primary residence to be distributed without administration.(ii) In all respects have the same effect as a decree of distribution after an accounting by a personal representative.(5 ) Within two years after the decree of distribution 20260SB1203PN1540 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has been made, a party in interest may file a petition to revoke the decree because an improper distribution has been ordered. If the court finds that an improper distribution has been ordered, the court shall revoke the decree and direct restitution as equity and justice require.(d) Reporting.--(1) No later than five years after the effective date of this section, the Local Government Commission shall conduct a study of county property offices that have established processes authorized under subsection (a).(2) No later than six years after the effective date of this section, the Local Government Commission shall submit a report of the study to the General Assembly and shall provide recommendations on the continuation, expansion or termination of the authority granted under subsection (a).(e) Realty transfer tax.--A county, city or school district that is due a payment of a realty transfer tax as a result of a transfer of property under this section may waive, refund or exempt the realty transfer tax subject to this section.(f) Expiration.--This section shall expire seven years after the effective date of this subsection.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County property office." The recorder of deeds, register of wills or other county government office responsible for the transfer of deeds within a county."Primary residence." Residential real property primarily used as a home with an assessed value of no more than $150,000.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1203PN1540 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930